Mississippi statutes. Title 65. Highways, Bridges and Ferries
Article 5. County Engineer.

§ 65-17-201.
Authority to employ engineer.

[With regard to any county which is exempt from the provisions of Section 19-2-3, this section shall read as follows:]

The boards of supervisors of the several counties of the State of Mississippi are authorized and empowered at their discretion to employ, as county engineer, a civil engineer or person qualified to perform the duties of a county engineer, and such assistant engineers as may be necessary. On all projects for the construction or reconstruction of a bridge which will cost more than Five Thousand Dollars ($5,000.00), or for the construction or reconstruction of roads which will cost more than Five Thousand Dollars ($5,000.00) per mile, the employment of an engineer qualified under the chapter on engineers shall be obligatory, whether the work is being done by the county or by a separate district, and whether the work is to be done by contract or otherwise; however, in obligatory cases the employment may be for the particular work, rather than for a term.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1930, § 6405; 1942, § 8353; Laws, 1924, ch. 215; Laws, 1948, ch. 258; Laws, 1988 Ex Sess, ch. 14, § 57, eff from and after October 1, 1989.

§ 65-17-201.
Authority to employ engineer.

[With regard to any county which is required to operate on a countywide system of road administration as described in Section 19-2-3, this section shall read as follows:]

The boards of supervisors of the several counties of the State of Mississippi are authorized and empowered at their discretion to employ, as county engineer, a civil engineer or person qualified to perform the duties of a county engineer, and such assistant engineers as may be necessary. On all projects for the construction or reconstruction of a bridge which will cost more than Twenty-five Thousand Dollars ($25,000.00), or for the construction or reconstruction of roads which will cost more than Twenty-five Thousand Dollars ($25,000.00) per mile, the employment of an engineer qualified under the chapter on engineers shall be obligatory, whether the work is to be done by contract or otherwise; however, in obligatory cases the employment may be for the particular work rather than for a term.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1930, § 6405; 1942, § 8353; Laws, 1924, ch. 215; Laws, 1948, ch. 258; Laws, 1988 Ex Sess, ch. 14, § 57, eff from and after October 1, 1989.

§ 65-17-203.
Duties of engineers.

The duties of the county engineer shall be to prepare all plans and estimates for the construction of bridges and superintend their construction, to make all estimates and plans of work to be done in the construction and maintenance of roads and superintend the work, to go over the report to the board of supervisors what work should be done to properly upkeep and maintain all roads and bridges in the county, and to check over and report to the board of supervisors on all estimates before payment by the board of supervisors of all work done on public roads.

The engineer may be required to furnish plans and estimates, and may superintend the construction of any road under the supervision of the state highway commission, if the highway commission may so elect. The purpose of this section is to provide a means whereby the board of supervisors and the highway commission may co-operate in such work, when same can be done, and reduce the expense of construction of any road.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1930, § 6406; 1942, § 8354; Laws, 1924, ch. 215.

§ 65-17-205.
Salary of engineer.

The compensation of the county engineer shall be determined by the board of supervisors of the county employing such engineer. The manner of making such compensation shall be spread annually upon the minutes of the board.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1930, § 6407; 1942, § 8355; Laws, 1924, ch. 215; Laws, 1932, ch. 203; Laws, 1938, ch. 320; Laws, 1958, ch. 213; Laws, 1962, ch. 261; Laws, 1966, ch. 304, § 1; Laws, 1987, ch. 447, eff from and after passage (approved April 2, 1987).

§ 65-17-207.
Control of engineer.

The employment and work of such engineer shall be under the control of the board of supervisors.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1930, § 6408; 1942, § 8356; Laws, 1924, ch. 215.

§ 65-17-209.
Repealed.

Repealed by Laws, 1983, ch. 469, § 10, eff from and after July 1, 1983.

[Codes, 1942, § 2926-66; Laws, 1962, ch. 255, § 16]